Arkansas, session 2025, SB84.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 15, Chapter 23, Subchapter 1, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
15-23-107. Prohibition on moratorium in watersheds and other bodies of
water.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, a state
agency, including without limitation the Department of Agriculture and the
Department of Energy and Environment, shall not institute a moratorium on the
issuance of permits in a watershed, including without limitation the Buffalo
River Watershed, or other body of water.
(b) If a state agency wishes to institute a moratorium related to a
watershed or other body of water, the state agency first shall obtain
approval from the Legislative Council.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Existing moratoriums.
A moratorium related to a watershed, including without limitation the
Buffalo River Watershed, or other body of water instituted before the
*CRH053*
01/21/2025 1:38:32 PM CRH053

SB84
effective date of this act is unenforceable on and after the effective date
of this act.


































01/21/2025 1:38:32 PM CRH053